src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-v5_tarvita_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo: Proofread the gold standard (below), then run analyser, then correct. 
# tarvita, valita, kiepitä


  Verb - tarvita - paradigmgroup v5: # meaning 'to need'/'behöva' - GOLD
     tarvita+V+Inf: tarvita
     tarvita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tarvitten
     tarvita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tarvittet
     tarvita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tarvittee
     tarvita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tarvittemma
     tarvita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tarvittetta
     tarvita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [tarvittee, tarvitteva, tarvittevva, tarvithaan]
     tarvita+V+Pass+Ind+Prs: tarvithaan
     tarvita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: tarvita
     tarvita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tarvittin
     tarvita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tarvittit
     tarvita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tarvitti
     tarvita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tarvittimma
     tarvita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tarvittitta
     tarvita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [tarvithiin, tarvittit]
     tarvita+V+Pass+Ind+Prt: tarvithiin
     tarvita+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: tarvitte
     tarvita+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: tarvikko
     tarvita+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: tarvitte
     tarvita+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: tarvikkaa
     tarvita+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: tarvittisin
     tarvita+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: tarvittisit
     tarvita+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: tarvittis
     tarvita+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: tarvittisima
     tarvita+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: tarvittisitta
     tarvita+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: [tarvittisit, tarvittisiva]
     tarvita+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tarvitteva #, tarvittevva
     tarvita+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: tarvittevat # tarvittevvat
     tarvita+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tarvittava #tarvittavva
     tarvita+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: tarvittavat #tarvittavvat
     tarvita+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: tarvinu
     tarvita+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [tarvihneet, tarvinheet]
     tarvita+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: tarvittu
     tarvita+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: tarvitut
     tarvita+V+AgPrc: tarvittema
     tarvita+V+Pass+Cond: tarvittais
     tarvita+V+InfE+Ine: tarvitessa
     tarvita+V+InfE+Ins: tarviten
     tarvita+V+InfMa+Ill: [tarvittemhaan, tarvittehmaan]
     tarvita+V+InfMa+Ine: tarvittemassa
     tarvita+V+InfMa+Ela: tarvittemasta
     tarvita+V+InfMa+Ade: tarvittemala
     tarvita+V+InfMa+Abe: tarvittematta
     tarvita+V+Der/minen+N+Sg+Nom: tarvitteminen

  Verb - valita - paradigmgroup v5: # meaning ''/'' - GOLD
     valita+V+Inf: valita
     valita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: valitten
     valita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: valittet
     valita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: valittee
     valita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: valittemma
     valita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: valittetta
     valita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [valittee, valitteva, valittevva, valithaan]
     valita+V+Pass+Ind+Prs: valithaan
     valita+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: valita
     valita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: valittin
     valita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: valittit
     valita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: valitti
     valita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: valittimma
     valita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: valittitta
     valita+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [valithiin, valittit]
     valita+V+Pass+Ind+Prt: valithiin
     valita+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: valitte
     valita+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: valikko
     valita+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: valitte
     valita+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: valikkaa
     valita+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: valittisin
     valita+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: valittisit
     valita+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: valittis
     valita+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: valittisima
     valita+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: valittisitta
     valita+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: [valittisit, valittisiva]
     valita+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: valitteva
     valita+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: valittevat
     valita+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: valittava
     valita+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: valittavat
     valita+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: valinu
     valita+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [valihneet, valinheet]
     valita+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: valittu
     valita+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: valitut
     valita+V+AgPrc: valittema
     valita+V+Pass+Cond: valittais
     valita+V+InfE+Ine: valitessa
     valita+V+InfE+Ins: valiten
     valita+V+InfMa+Ill: [valittehmaan, valittemhaan]
     valita+V+InfMa+Ine: valittemassa
     valita+V+InfMa+Ela: valittemasta
     valita+V+InfMa+Ade: valittemala
     valita+V+InfMa+Abe: valittematta
     valita+V+Der/minen+N+Sg+Nom: valitteminen

  Verb - kiepitä - paradigmgroup v5: # meaning ''/'' - GOLD
     kiepitä+V+Inf: [kiepitä]
     kiepitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [kiepitten]
     kiepitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [kiepittet]
     kiepitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [kiepittee]
     kiepitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [kiepittemmä]
     kiepitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [kiepittettä]
     kiepitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [kiepittee, kiepittevvä, kiepittevä, kiepithään]
     kiepitä+V+Pass+Ind+Prs: [kiepithään]
     kiepitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: [kiepitä]
     kiepitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [kiepittin]
     kiepitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [kiepittit]
     kiepitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [kiepitti]
     kiepitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [kiepittimmä]
     kiepitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [kiepittittä]
     kiepitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kiepithiin, kiepittit]
     kiepitä+V+Pass+Ind+Prt: [kiepithiin]
     kiepitä+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: [kiepitte]
     kiepitä+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: [kiepikkö]
     kiepitä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: [kiepitte]
     kiepitä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: [kiepikkää]
     kiepitä+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: [kiepittisin]
     kiepitä+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: [kiepittisit]
     kiepitä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: [kiepittis]
     kiepitä+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: [kiepittisimä]
     kiepitä+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: [kiepittisittä]
     kiepitä+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: [kiepittisit, kiepittisivä]
     kiepitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: [kiepittevä]
     kiepitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: [kiepittevät]
     kiepitä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: [kiepittävä]
     kiepitä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: [kiepittävät]
     kiepitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [kiepiny]
     kiepitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [kiepihneet, kiepinheet]
     kiepitä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [kiepitty]
     kiepitä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [kiepityt]
     kiepitä+V+AgPrc: [kiepittemä]
     kiepitä+V+Pass+Cond: [kiepittäis]
     kiepitä+V+InfE+Ine: [kiepitessä]
     kiepitä+V+InfE+Ins: [kiepiten]
     kiepitä+V+InfMa+Ill: [kiepittehmään, kiepittemhään]
     kiepitä+V+InfMa+Ine: [kiepittemässä]
     kiepitä+V+InfMa+Ela: [kiepittemästä]
     kiepitä+V+InfMa+Ade: [kiepittemälä]
     kiepitä+V+InfMa+Abe: [kiepittemättä]
     kiepitä+V+Der/minen+N+Sg+Nom: [kiepitteminen]

Verb - tilkitä - paradigmgroup v5: # meaning ''/'' - GOLD
     tilkitä+V+Inf: [tilkitä]
     tilkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [tilkitten]
     tilkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [tilkittet]
     tilkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [tilkittee]
     tilkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [tilkittemmä]
     tilkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [tilkittettä]
     tilkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [tilkithään, tilkittee, tilkittevvä, tilkittevä]
     tilkitä+V+Pass+Ind+Prs: [tilkithään]
     tilkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: [tilkitä]
     tilkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [tilkittin]
     tilkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [tilkittit]
     tilkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [tilkitti]
     tilkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [tilkittimmä]
     tilkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [tilkittittä]
     tilkitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [tilkithiin, tilkittit]
     tilkitä+V+Pass+Ind+Prt: [tilkithiin]
     tilkitä+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: [tilkitte]
     tilkitä+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: [tilkikkö]
     tilkitä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: [tilkitte]
     tilkitä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: [tilkikkää]
     tilkitä+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: [tilkittisin]
     tilkitä+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: [tilkittisit]
     tilkitä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: [tilkittis]
     tilkitä+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: [tilkittisimä]
     tilkitä+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: [tilkittisittä]
     tilkitä+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: [tilkittisit, tilkittisivä]
     tilkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: [tilkittevä]
     tilkitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: [tilkittevät]
     tilkitä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: [tilkittävä]
     tilkitä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: [tilkittävät]
     tilkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [tilkiny]
     tilkitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [tilkihneet, tilkinheet]
     tilkitä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [tilkitty]
     tilkitä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [tilkityt]
     tilkitä+V+AgPrc: [tilkittemä]
     tilkitä+V+Pass+Cond: [tilkittäis]
     tilkitä+V+InfE+Ine: [tilkitessä]
     tilkitä+V+InfE+Ins: [tilkiten]
     tilkitä+V+InfMa+Ill: [tilkittehmään, tilkittemhään]
     tilkitä+V+InfMa+Ine: [tilkittemässä]
     tilkitä+V+InfMa+Ela: [tilkittemästä]
     tilkitä+V+InfMa+Ade: [tilkittemälä]
     tilkitä+V+InfMa+Abe: [tilkittemättä]
     tilkitä+V+Der/minen+N+Sg+Nom: [tilkitteminen]
